Wisconsin, session 2025, AB543.
do enact as follows:AB543,13Section 1. 77.54 (72) of the statutes is amended to read:AB543,2,6177.54 (72) The sales price from the sale of and the storage, use, or other 2consumption of a membership sold to a real estate broker licensed under ch. 452 3who, pursuant to the broker’s membership agreement, offers to compensate and or 4cooperate with, or both, other real estate brokers in brokering sales of properties 5and who obtains access to information about real estate listings and compensation 6offers from other real estate brokers.AB543,27Section 2. Effective date.AB543,2,98(1) This act takes effect on first day of the 3rd month beginning after 9publication.AB543,2,1010